Utah statutes.
31A-17-507.   Reserve valuation method -- Life insurance and endowment
benefits.
(1)  Except as otherwise provided in Sections 31A-17-508, 31A-17-511, and
31A-17-513, reserves according to the commissioner's reserve valuation method,
for the life insurance and endowment benefits of policies providing for a
uniform amount of insurance and requiring the payment of uniform premiums
shall be the excess, if any, of the present value, at the date of valuation,
of such future guaranteed benefits provided for by such policies, over the
then present value of any future modified net premiums therefor.  The modified
net premiums for any such policy shall be such uniform percentage of the
respective contract premiums for such benefits that the present value, at the
date of issue of the policy, of all such modified net premiums shall be equal
to the sum of the then present value of such benefits provided for by the
policy and the excess of Subsection (1)(a) over Subsection (1)(b), as follows:
(a)  A net level annual premium equal to the present value, at the date of
issue, of such benefits provided for after the first policy year, divided by
the present value, at the date of issue, of an annuity of one per annum
payable on the first and each subsequent anniversary of such policy on which a
premium falls due; provided, however, that such net level annual premium shall
not exceed the net level annual premium on the 19 year premium whole life plan
for insurance of the same amount at an age one year higher than the age at
issue of such policy.
(b)  A net one year term premium for such benefits provided for in the first
policy year.
(2)  Provided that for any life insurance policy issued on or after January 1,
1997, for which the contract premium in the first policy year exceeds that of
the second year and for which no comparable additional benefit is provided in
the first year for such excess and which provides an endowment benefit or a
cash surrender value or a combination thereof in an amount greater than such
excess premium, the reserve according to the commissioner's reserve valuation
method as of any policy anniversary occurring on or before the assumed ending
date defined herein as the first policy anniversary on which the sum of any
endowment benefit and any cash surrender value then available is greater than
such excess premium shall, except as otherwise provided in Section 31A-17-511,
be the greater of the reserve as of such policy anniversary calculated as
described in Subsection (1) and the reserve as of such policy anniversary
calculated as described in that subsection, but with:
(a)  the value defined in Subsection (1)(a) being reduced by 15% of the amount
of such excess first year premium;
(b)  all present values of benefits and premiums being determined without
reference to premiums or benefits provided for by the policy after the assumed
ending date;
(c)  the policy being assumed to mature on such date as an endowment; and
(d)  the cash surrender value provided on such date being considered as an
endowment benefit.  In making the above comparison the mortality and interest
bases stated in Sections 31A-17-504 and 31A-17-506 shall be used.
(3)  Reserves according to the commissioner's reserve valuation method for:
(a) life insurance policies providing for a varying amount of insurance or
requiring the payment of varying premiums;
(b) group annuity and pure endowment contracts  purchased under a retirement
plan or plan of deferred compensation, established or maintained by an
employer, including a partnership or sole proprietorship, or by an employee
organization, or by both, other than a plan providing individual retirement
accounts or individual retirement annuities under Section 408, Internal
Revenue Code;
(c) accident and health and accidental death benefits in all policies and
contracts; and
(d) all other benefits, except life insurance and endowment benefits in life
insurance policies and benefits provided by all other annuity and pure
endowment contracts, shall be calculated by a method consistent with the
principles of Subsections (1) and (2).
